src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_OLLA
!!  The verb olla has very peculiar and heteroclitic inflection with lot of
!!  common short forms in standard spoken Finnish:
!!€gt-norm:  Verb olla
!!€  olla: olla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # be
!!€  lienen: olla+V+Act+Pot+Sg1
!!€  lie: olla+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg
!!€  olija: olla+V+Der/ja+Sg+Nom
0:oll  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:oll  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ole  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:on  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ovat  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0+Use/NG:ol  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ; ! generate liene-
0:ol  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ol  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;
0:ole  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!0:lie  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;  - exceptional; general cont.lexicon contains Indicative forms 
+Act+Pot+Pl1:lie%>ne%>mme VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Pl2:lie%>ne%>tte VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Pl3:lie%>ne%>vät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Sg1:lie%>ne%>n   VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Sg2:lie%>ne%>t   VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Sg3:lie%>ne%>e   VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+ConNeg:lie%>ne VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+PrfPrc:lie%>n   ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT     ;
+Act+Pot+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:lie%>nyt  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Act+Pot+Prt+ConNeg+Pl:lie%>neet  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!  these were found in exceptions.lexc, but moved here
!  in order to have all olla in one place. Pleas remove
!  doublets when detected.

+Act+Der/maisilla:olemaisilla  VERB_BACK_POSS_AN  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe:olematta  VERB_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Ade:olemalla  VERB_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Ela:olemasta  VERB_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Ill:olemaan  VERB_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Ine:olemassa  VERB_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Act+InfMa+Sg+Ins:oleman  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg2+s:oles  #  ;
+Act+Cond+Sg1+Dial/standard:oisin  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2+Dial/standard:oisit  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3+Dial/standard:ois  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1+Dial/standard:oisimme  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2+Dial/standard:oisitte  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3+Dial/standard:oisivat  VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Pss+PrfPrc:ol  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
!+Act+AgPrc:olem  ADJ_AALTOILEVA  ;
+Act+NegPrc:olemat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Der/inen:olevai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
+Act+PrsPrc:olev  ADJ_AALTOILEVA  ;
+Der/minen:olemi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
+Der/ja:olij  NOUN_SOITTAJA  ;
+Act+PrfPrc:oll  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
+Act+Pot+Sg1:lienen  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+Sg2:lienet  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+Sg3:lienee  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+Pl1:lienemme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+Pl2:lienette  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+Pl3:lienevät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+ConNeg:liene  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Act+Pot+ConNeg:lie  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON VERB_ARVAILLA


:ile  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:ile  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ile  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:ile  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ill  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:ill  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:ill  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:il  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:il  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;

! !:ele  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ; rj: form is not used
!:ele  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
! !:ele  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
!:ele  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!:ell  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
!:ell  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
!:ell  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

!:el  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
!:el  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;

LEXICON VERB_EI

+Neg:el  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_L_ARCHAIC  ;
+Neg:el  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl1:emme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl1+Foc/ka:emmekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl2:ette  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl2+Foc/ka:ettekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl3:eivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Pl3+Foc/ka:eivätkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg1:en  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg1+Foc/ka:enkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg1+Qst+Dial:eks  #  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg2:et  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg2+Foc/ka:etkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg2+Qst+Dial:eks  #  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg3:ei  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg3+Foc/ka:eikä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Sg3+Qst+Dial:eks  #  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1+Foc/ka+Dial:elkäämmekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1+Foc/ka:älkäämmekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1+Dial:elkäämme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1:älkäämme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Foc/ka+Dial:elkääkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Foc/ka:älkääkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Foc/s:älkääs  #  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Dial:elkää  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2:älkää  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3+Foc/ka+Dial:elköötkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3+Foc/ka:älköötkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3+Dial:elkööt  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3:älkööt  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Foc/ka+Dial:eläkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Foc/ka:äläkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Foc/s:äläs  #  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial:elä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2:älä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3+Foc/ka+Dial:elköönkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3+Foc/ka:älköönkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3+Dial:elköön  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3:älköön  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Neg:äl  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_L_ARCHAIC  ;
+Neg:äl  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

LEXICON VERB_ERATA

:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
:at  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;

:kane  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:kane  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:kane  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:kane  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:kan  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:kan  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:kan  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;


LEXICON VERB_ETUILLA

:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:l  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ;
:  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
:  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;

LEXICON VERB_HALAJAA

:ja  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:ja  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ja  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
:ja  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:ja  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:t  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

LEXICON VERB_KIERTYÄ

:ryt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
:ryt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

:ry  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:ry  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
:ry  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;

:ty  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
:ty  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;
