src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
ammuskella+V:ammuskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
annostella+V:annostel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
arvella+V:arvel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
autoilla+V:auto  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
ei+V:  VERB_EI  ;
elostella+V:elostel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
erata+V:er  VERB_ERATA  ;
etuilla+V:etuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
flirttailla+V:flirtta  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
haeskella+V:haeskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
halailla+V:hala  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
halata+V:hala  VERB_HALAJAA  ;
hamuilla+V:hamuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
heijastella+V:heijastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
hentoilla+V:hento  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
hidastella+V:hidastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
hiertyä+V:hier  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
hikoilla+V:hiko  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
hoopoilla+V:hoopo  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
hoppuilla+V:hoppuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
huokailla+V:huoka  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
hurskastella+V:hurskastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
hämärtyä+V:hämär  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
ilmailla+V:ilma  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
intoilla+V:into  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
ivailla+V:iva  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
jaksella+V:jaksel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
jermuilla+V:jermuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
jottei+V:jott  VERB_EI  ;
jumppailla+V:jumppa  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kaatuilla+V:kaatuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kahlailla+V:kahla  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kakistella+V:kakistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kangastella+V:kangastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
karvastella+V:karvastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kasailla+V:kasa  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kauhistella+V:kauhistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
keilailla+V:keila  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
keinuskella+V:keinuskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kellertyä+V:keller  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
kertoilla+V:kerto  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kertyä+V:ker  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
kiertyä+V:kier  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
kiihkoilla+V:kiihko  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kiivastella+V:kiivastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kilpailla+V:kilpa  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kipertyä+V:kiper  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
kirmailla+V:kirma  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kiukkuilla+V:kiukkuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kivertyä+V:kiver  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
kokkailla+V:kokka  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kompastella+V:kompastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
koristella+V:koristel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
korjailla+V:korja  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kouruilla+V:kouruil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kuivailla+V:kuiva  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kumpuilla+V:kumpuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kursailla+V:kursa  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
kuulustella+V:kuulustel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
kähertyä+V:käher  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
käpertyä+V:käper  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
lainailla+V:laina  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
lautailla+V:lauta  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
limboilla+V:limbo  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
liukastella+V:liukastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
lommoilla+V:lommo  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
lupailla+V:lupa  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
luulla+V:luul  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
läsnäolla+V:läsnä  VERB_OLLA  ;
majailla+V:maja  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
matkailla+V:matka  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
metkuilla+V:metkuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
mopoilla+V:mopo  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
muotoilla+V:muoto  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
muttei+V:mutt  VERB_EI  ;
mutustella+V:mutustel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
myrtyä+V:myr  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
narrailla+V:narra  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
nojailla+V:noja  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
nuoleskella+V:nuoleskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
nöyrtyä+V:nöyr  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
oikoilla+V:oiko  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
olla+V:  VERB_OLLA  ;
oudostella+V:oudostel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
palata+V:pala  VERB_HALAJAA  ;
parveilla+V:parveil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
pasteerailla+V:pasteera  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
piirtyä+V:piir  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
poimiskella+V:poimiskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
pomppoilla+V:pomppo  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
pottuilla+V:pottuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
pulppuilla+V:pulppuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
putoilla+V:puto  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
pyörtyä+V:pyör  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
pökertyä+V:pöker  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
raiteilla+V:raiteil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
rehvastella+V:rehvastel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
riiailla+V:riia  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
ripustella+V:ripustel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
ruuvailla+V:ruuva  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
seisoskella+V:seisoskel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
seurailla+V:seura  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
siirtyä+V:siir  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
sinertyä+V:siner  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
siunailla+V:siuna  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
sumeilla+V:sumeil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
sykertyä+V:syker  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
taitoluistella+V:taitoluistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
talkoilla+V:talko  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
tasapainoilla+V:tasapaino  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
tiedustella+V:tiedustel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
toljailla+V:tolja  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
tulistella+V:tulistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
tuulla+V:tuul  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
typertyä+V:typer  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
uhkailla+V:uhka  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
valmistella+V:valmistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
vauhkoilla+V:vauhko  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
velmuilla+V:velmuil  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
vertyä+V:ver  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
vihertyä+V:viher  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
vihjailla+V:vihja  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
vitkailla+V:vitka  VERB_ARVAILLA  ;
voimistella+V:voimistel  VERB_ETUILLA  ;
ärtyä+V:är  VERB_KIERTYÄ  ;
